District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.31

Short title.

This part may be cited as the “First Source Compliance Act of 2008”.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1018, 55 DCR 7598

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of D.C. Law 17-219, § 1023, see § 201(a) of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-572, December 2, 2008, 55 DCR 12452).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 201(a) of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-13, February 23, 2009, 56 DCR 1920).